Connecticut, session 2026, SB00487.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
"state agency" means a department, board, council, commission,
institution or other executive branch agency and "fiscal intermediary"
means an organization that contracts with a state agency to provide
payroll, taxes or administrative services for the state agency.
(b) On and after October 1, 2026, any state agency that enters into,
amends or renews a contract with a fiscal intermediary that includes
payroll services shall ensure that such contract requires wages to be paid
in a timely manner and includes a provision imposing financial
penalties to be paid by the fiscal intermediary to the state agency in the
event the fiscal intermediary fails to process payroll within the
timeframe set forth in such contract. Any such contract shall provide
that such penalty shall be in an amount equivalent to fifty per cent of
the value of the unpaid wages.
LCO No. 3044 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 487
(c) The applicable state agency shall impose any penalty required
under this section and if the fiscal intermediary fails to pay such penalty,
the Attorney General, upon complaint of the state agency, may bring an
action in the Superior Court to recover such penalty.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section